New York, session 2025-2026, A381.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 14 of the transportation law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 37 to read as follows: 3 37. To study and report yearly to the governor, the assembly and the 4 senate, the one hundred most structurally damaged bridges in the state. 5 § 2. The department of transportation shall report to the governor and 6 the legislature, pursuant to section one of this act, no later than one 7 year after this act shall have become a law and each year thereafter. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01599-01-5